West Virginia, session 2026, HB4074.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS. §9-5-34. Tri-Share pilot program for expansion of childcare services to employees. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that a Tri-Share pilot program which allows participating employers, employees, and the state to share equal responsibility for childcare of dependent children from birth to 17 years of age by each contributing one-third of the total cost, will assist parents and caretakers to participate in the workforce or access training that can advance their degrees.(b) The Department of Human Services shall develop and implement a three-year Tri-Share pilot program during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, testing the feasibility of participating employers and the access to employees to high-quality, affordable childcare.  The Tri-Share pilot program shall consist of three urban and two rural counties. (c) Eligibility for the Tri-Share pilot program shall consist of employees of participating employers whose household income is between 150 – 250 percent of the Federal Poverty Level and who are not eligible for childcare subsidy.(d) The Department of Human Services shall establish guidelines to implement the Tri-Share pilot program and technical assistance shall be included in the Tri-Share pilot program.  The Department of Human Services may contract with existing training programs or other qualified providers with experience relevant to Tri-Share pilot program participants for such technical assistance.(e) Upon completion of the Tri-Share pilot program, if it is determined that the project was effective in achieving the objective of assisting employees with improving the stability, affordability, access, and quality of childcare, the Department of Human Services may implement a similar statewide program for participating employers and qualified employees.(f) The Department of Human Services shall report to the Legislative Oversight Commission on Health and Human Resources Accountability each year on the participation of employer and employees, the availability of childcare facilities, the costs of childcare facilities, and to the extent practicable, the impact the Tri-Share pilot program has had on the community in assisting parents and caretakers to participate in the workforce or access training that can advance their degrees.  Following successful completion of the Tri-Share pilot program, effectiveness of the Tri-Share pilot program shall be evaluated by the Department of Human Services in consultation with the Legislative Oversight Commission on Health and Human Resources Accountability.